Florida, session 2026, SB1058.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 36 37 Section 1.âSection 376.91, Florida Statutes, is amended to 38 read: 39 376.91âStatewide cleanup of perfluoroalkyl and 40 polyfluoroalkyl substances; liability protection; financial 41 assistance.â 42 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 43 (a)ââAll appropriate inquiriesâ means consideration of PFAS 44 contamination, included in the All Appropriate Inquiries rule 45 under 40 C.F.R. s. 312.20, which sets the federal standards and 46 practices necessary to fulfill the requirements of the 47 Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and 48 Liability Act. 49 (b)(a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Environmental 50 Protection. 51 (c)ââInstitutional controlâ means an enforceable 52 restriction or condition designed to prevent exposure to PFAS 53 contamination. 54 (d)(b)ââPFASâ means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl 55 substances, including perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), and 56 perfluorooctane sulfonate (PFOS), and any other compounds 57 designated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. 58 (e)ââPSPAâ means a PFAS site participation agreement a 59 prospective purchaser executes with the department. 60 (2)âSTATEWIDE CLEANUP TARGET LEVELS.â 61 (a)âIf the United States Environmental Protection Agency 62 has not finalized its standards for PFAS in drinking water, 63 groundwater, and soil by January 1, 2026, the department shall 64 adopt by rule statewide cleanup target levels for PFAS in 65 drinking water, groundwater, and soil using criteria set forth 66 in s. 376.30701, with priority given to PFOA and PFOS. The rules 67 established by the department, consistent with the United States 68 Environmental Protection Agencyâs standards, for statewide 69 cleanup target levels for PFAS are may not take effect until 70 ratified by the Legislature. 71 (b)âThe department may update the statewide cleanup target 72 levels as necessary to remain aligned with the United States 73 Environmental Protection Agencyâs risk assessments or health 74 advisories. Any update to the statewide cleanup target levels 75 adopted by the department must be ratified by the Legislature 76 under s. 120.541(3). 77 (b)âUntil the departmentâs rule for a particular PFAS 78 constituent has been ratified by the Legislature, a governmental 79 entity or private water supplier may not be subject to any 80 administrative or judicial action under this chapter brought by 81 any state or local governmental entity to compel or enjoin site 82 rehabilitation, to require payment for the cost of 83 rehabilitation of environmental contamination, or to require 84 payment of any fines or penalties regarding rehabilitation based 85 on the presence of that particular PFAS constituent. 86 (c)âUntil the United States Environmental Protection Agency 87 establishes final standards for additional PFAS, the department 88 shall adopt interim screening values to guide site assessment 89 and remedial actions rehabilitation is completed or rules for 90 statewide cleanup target levels are ratified by the Legislature, 91 any statute of limitations that would bar a state or local 92 governmental entity from pursuing relief in accordance with its 93 existing authority is tolled from June 20, 2022. 94 (d)âThis section does not affect the ability or authority 95 to seek any recourse or relief from any person who may have 96 liability with respect to a contaminated site and who did not 97 receive protection under paragraph (b). 98 (3)âBONA FIDE PROSPECTIVE PURCHASER PROTECTION.â 99 (a)âTo qualify for liability protection, an applicant may 100 not have any affiliation with a liable party and must do all of 101 the following: 102 1.âConduct all appropriate inquiries that include a PFAS 103 analysis. 104 2.âComply with all continuing obligations, including 105 maintenance of institutional controls and reporting of releases. 106 The department may impose United States Environmental Protection 107 Agency due diligence requirements for a Phase I Environmental 108 Site Assessment under the United States Environmental Protection 109 Agencyâs all appropriate inquiries rule. 110 (b)1.âThe department shall review a PSPA application for 111 completeness within 30 days after receipt of the application. 112 2.âIf the department does not deny a PSPA application 113 within 120 days after receipt of the application, the 114 application is deemed approved. 115 3.âAfter the department executes a PSPA, liability 116 protection is effective during the time period a prospective 117 purchaser takes to comply with this section. 118 (c)âA bona fide prospective purchaser is not liable for 119 PFAS contamination that exists before acquisition. 120 (d)âLiability protection does not bar the department or 121 other parties from pursuing cost recovery against responsible 122 persons as authorized under this chapter. 123 (e)âThe department shall issue completion letters to 124 prospective purchasers upon satisfaction of all PSPA 125 obligations. 126 (f)âA prospective purchaser forfeits liability protection 127 under this section for any willful violation of a PSPA 128 application or the failure to maintain continuing obligations 129 established by the department. 130 (4)âFINANCIAL ASSISTANCE.âThe department and the Department 131 of Revenue shall ensure eligibility for remediation tax credits, 132 brownfield grants, and other financial assistance programs for 133 sites that meet the requirements of subsection (3). 134 Section 2.âSection 633.3041, Florida Statutes, is created 135 to read: 136 633.3041âClass B firefighting foam.â 137 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 138 (a)ââClass B firefighting foamâ means any firefighting foam 139 designed to extinguish fires involving flammable liquids. 140 (b)ââPFAS chemicalsâ means a class of fluorinated organic 141 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom, 142 including perfluoroalkyl substances, designed to be fully 143 functional in Class B firefighting foam formulations. 144 (c)ââTestingâ means a calibration, conformance, or fixed 145 system testing. 146 (2)âBeginning January 1, 2027, a fire service provider may 147 not discharge or otherwise use Class B firefighting foam that 148 contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals unless such 149 discharge or use occurs in the course of providing fire 150 prevention services or in response to an emergency firefighting 151 operation. 152 (3)âThis section does not: 153 (a)âRestrict the manufacturing, sale, or distribution of 154 Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS 155 chemicals; 156 (b)âRestrict the discharge or use of Class B firefighting 157 foam in providing fire prevention services or in response to an 158 emergency firefighting operation; or 159 (c)âPrevent the use of nonfluorinated foams, including 160 other Class B firefighting foams, for purposes of firefighter 161 training or testing. 162 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.